Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska21-1795
Other loan programs.

(1) A credit union may participate in any guaranteed loan program of the federal or state government under the terms and conditions specified in the law under which such a program is provided.

(2) A credit union may purchase the conditional sales contracts, notes, and similar instruments of its members.

Laws 1996, LB 948, § 95.